South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S219.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Federal fishing regulations declared to be law of State, exceptions SECTION 1.    Section 50-5-2730 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 50-5-2730.    (A) Unless otherwise provided by law, any regulations promulgated by the federal government under the Fishery Conservation and Management Act (PL 94-265) or the Atlantic Tuna Conservation Act (PL 94-70) which establishes seasons, fishing periods, gear restrictions, sales restrictions, or bag, catch, size, or possession limits on fish are declared to be the law of this State and apply statewide including in state waters. (B) This provision does not apply to: (1) black sea bass (Centropristis striata) whose lawful catch limit is five fish per person per day or the same as the federal limit for black sea bass, whichever is higher. The lawful minimum size for black sea bass is thirteen inches total length and there is no closed season; (2) red snapper (Lutjanus campechanus) whose lawful catch limit is two fish per person per day. The lawful minimum size for red snapper is twenty inches total length and there is no closed season; or (3) all other species under the Snapper-Grouper Fishery Management Plan. The lawful catch limit for a species under that plan is the limit as published in the 2024-2025 South Carolina Hunting and Fishing Laws and Regulations Guide, or the federal limit for the species, whichever is higher. The lawful minimum size limit for a species under that plan is the size as published in the 2024-2025 South Carolina Hunting and Fishing Laws and Regulations Guide, or the federal limit for the species, whichever is lower. There is no closed season. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 6th day of May, 2025. Approved the 8th day of May, 2025. __________